Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2171
Complaint; unknown owners or interests; allegations.

If the number of shares or interests is known, but the owners thereof are unknown, or if there are, or are supposed to be, any interests which are unknown, contingent or doubtful, these facts shall be set forth in the complaint with reasonable certainty.

R.S.1867, Code § 803, p. 538;

R.S.1913, § 8286;

C.S.1922, § 9239;

C.S.1929, § 20-2171;

R.S.1943, § 25-2171;

Laws 2002, LB 876, § 42.